ckt.rules.lexc
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

Multichar_Symbols
%.n                     ! Noun
%.prn                   ! Pronoun
%.ij                    ! Interjection
%.cnjcoo                ! Co%-ordinating conjunction
%.cnjadv                ! Adverbial conjunction
%.v                     ! Verb
%.adv                   ! Adverb
%.adj                   ! Adjective
%.part                  ! Particle
%.ptcp                  ! Participle
%.cmp                   ! Compound
%.incorp                ! Incorporated stem
%.clitic                ! Clitic
%.emph                  ! Emphatic clitic

%.lpar
%.rpar
%.sent
%.rquot
%.lquot
%.guio
%.cm
%.apos
%.quot
%.par


%.iv                    ! Intransitive
%.tv                    ! Transitive

! %<stat%>                  ! Stative forms
!
! %<neut%>                  ! Neutral aspect
! %<prog%>                  ! Progressive aspect
!
! %<aor%>                   ! Non%-future
! %<fut%>                   ! Future
! %<intn%>                  ! Intentional
! %<cond%>                  ! Conditional
!
! %<inf%>                   ! Infinitive
! %<perf%>                  ! Perfect
! %<hab%>                   ! Habitual

! %<gna_sim%>               ! Simultaneous converb
! %<gna_ant%>               ! Anterior temporal converb (temporal sequence)
! %<gna_res%>               ! Anterior temporal converb (consequence)
!
! %<act%>
! %<pass%>
! %<ger%>

DES
TR
MUT
MUT
FIN
RES
REV
TRSF
EAT
SEARCH
DRAG
GO
VERS
GET
FUND
GO
GO
CATCH
MULT
PLUR
COMB
FREQ
MCP
RAPID
GRAD
LIBER
REC
VB
CS
DES
ITER
DISTR
PLAC
INCH
COMPL
INS
CAR
NMLZ
ATTR

1SG%.S%/A
1PL%.S%/A
2%.S%/A%.SUBJ
3%.S%/A%.SUBJ
2%/3%.S%/A
LOW%.A
LOW%.A%.SUBJ
PF
ST
FUT
COND
INV
IPFV
! NON-FIN
INF
SIM
LOC
TOOL
CONC
PURP
PREF


CHECK

NP%.1SG
NP%.1PL
NP%.2SG
NP%.2PL

TH
1SG%.S
1PL%.S%/O
2%/3SG%.S
2PL%.S%/O
2%/3SG%.S
PL
IRR
IRR%.2%/3SG%.S
1SG%.O
1PL%.O
2SG%.O
3SG%.O
2PL%.A%.3%.O
3SG%.A%.3%.O



%<pl%>                    ! Plural
%<sg%>                    ! Singular

%<sing%>                  ! Singulative

%<aa%>                    ! Animates

%<def%>                   ! Definite

%<abl%>                   ! Ablative
%<abs%>                   ! Absolutive
%<ori%>                   ! Orientative
%<erg%>                   ! Ergative
%<all%>                   ! Allative
%<ess%>                   ! Essive [Equative]
%<loc%>                   ! Locative

%<ine%>                   ! Inessive
%<subst%>                 ! Substantive
%<per%>                   ! Perlative
%<com%>                   ! Comitative
%<assoc%>                 ! Associative
%<prv%>                   ! Privative

%<nmzr%>                  ! Nominalizer

%<px1sg%>                 ! 1sg possessor
%<px2sg%>                 ! 2sg possessor
%<px3sg%>                 ! 3sg possessor
%<px1pl%>                 ! 1pl possessor
%<px2pl%>                 ! 2pl possessor
%<px3pl%>                 ! 3pl possessor

%<poss%>                  ! Possessor

%<1sg%>                   ! 1sg possessed
%<2sg%>                   ! 2sg possessed
%<3sg%>                   ! 3sg possessed
%<1pl%>                   ! 1pl possessed
%<2pl%>                   ! 2pl possessed
%<3pl%>                   ! 3pl possessed

%<top%>                   ! Spatial derivations
%<side%>
%<edge%>
%<near%>
%<bottom%>
%<ext%>
%<among%>
%<in%>
%<surf%>
%<front%>


%<adv_prol%>              ! Prolative adverb

%<dim%>
%<aug%>
%<coop%>
%<prtt%>                  ! Part of
%<pers_n%>                ! Personal name

%<pers%>                  ! Personal pronoun
%<itg%>                   ! Interrogative pronoun
%<ind%>                   ! Indicative?
%<dem%>                   ! Demonstrative pronoun
%<quant%>                 ! Quantifier pronoun
%<p1%>                    ! First person
%<p2%>                    ! Second person
%<p3%>                    ! Third person
%<der%>
%<subst%>
%<imposs%>

%<com%>
%<restr%>
%<intens%>
%<approx%>

%{Æ%}                     ! э or а
%{T%}                     ! latin; erg & com т ot 0
%{G%}                     ! all & abl; г/й/э
%{ы%}                     ! Epenthetic schwa: ы or 0
%{и%}                     ! For plural: и or 0
%{N%}                     ! allophones of ng
%{R%}                     ! р or н
%{I%}                     ! и or й in suffixes

%{⁺ⱽᴴ%}                   ! Trigger for dominant harmony
%{·%}                     ! Trigger for stem%-final vowel deletion
%{°%}                     ! Trigger for stem%-final vowel reduction
%{☭%}                     ! Trigger for loan word phonology

%+                        ! Incorporation boundary
%>                        ! Morpheme boundary

! flag diacritics
@P.CASE.com@ @R.CASE.com@
@P.CASE.assoc@ @R.CASE.assoc@
@P.CASE.prv@ @R.CASE.prv@
@D.CASE@
@P.VPR.t@ @R.VPR.t@
@P.VPR.myt@ @R.VPR.myt@
@P.VPR.m@ @R.VPR.m@
@P.VPR.myn@ @R.VPR.myn@
@P.VPR.myns@ @R.VPR.myns@
@P.VPR.q@ @R.VPR.q@
@P.VPR.n@ @R.VPR.n@
@P.VPR.ne@ @R.VPR.ne@
@P.VPR.yn@ @R.VPR.yn@
@P.VPR.perf@ @R.VPR.perf@
@P.VPR.hab@ @R.VPR.hab@
@P.VPR.vb-com@ @R.VPR.vb-com@
@P.VPR.vb-restr@ @R.VPR.vb-restr@
@P.VPR.vb-intens@ @R.VPR.vb-intens@
@P.VPR.vb-approx@ @R.VPR.vb-approx@
@P.VPR.vb-neg@ @R.VPR.vb-neg@
@P.VPR.vb-neg2@ @R.VPR.vb-neg2@
@P.VPR.imposs@ @R.VPR.imposs@
@P.VPR.nil@ @R.VPR.nil@
@D.VPR@
@D.TENSE@
@U.V.iv@ @R.V.iv@ @P.V.iv@
@U.V.tv@ @R.V.tv@ @P.V.tv@
@P.ADJ.n@ @R.ADJ.n@
@P.ADJ.e@ @R.ADJ.e@
@P.itsa.verb@ @R.itsa.verb@ @U.itsa.adj@ @U.itsa.noun@
@P.complex.incorp@ @P.complex.cmp@ @D.complex@

%[%+approx%]
%[%+ints%]
%[%+ints2%]
%[%+ints3%]
%[%+desid%]
%[%+ap%]
%[%+caus%]
%[%+fut%]
%[%+cond%]
%[%+inv%]       ! тку
%[%+inv2%]       ! инэ
%[%+f%]        ! female of all types of animals
%[%+restr%]
%[%+approx%]
%[%+auth%]
%[%+imposs%]
%[%+vb%-approx%]
%[%+vb%-com%]
%[%+vb%-intens%]
%[%+vb%-neg%]
%[%+vb%-neg2%]
%[%+vb%-restr%]



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

!Temp ;
! Negation ;
Case-prefixes ;
Adj-prefixes ;
Intensifiers ;
N-deriv-prefixes ;
Nouns ;
Adverbs ;
Adjectives ;
Interjections ;
Participles ;
Conjunctions ;
Miscellaneous ;
Postpositions ;
Punctuation ;
Pronouns ;
Verb-prefixes ;
V-Tense-Prefixes ;
! Verb-deriv-prefixes ;
! Verbs ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

! LEXICON Negation
! CAR%[%+neg%]:%{Æ%}%> Case-prefixes ;
! CAR%[%+neg%]:%{Æ%}%> Verb-prefixes ;


LEXICON ADV
%.adv: # ;
%.adv%.rel:%>%{ы%}ԓь N-DERIV-III ;


LEXICON ADJ
! @U.itsa.verb@%<v%>%<iv%>:@U.itsa.verb@ V-IV ;
: ADJ-FIN ;
@D.VPR@%.adj%.3sg:@D.VPR@ # ;


LEXICON ADJ-FIN

@R.ADJ.n@%.adj:@R.ADJ.n@ PERS-NUM-CLITICS ;
%.adj: PERS-NUM-CLITICS ;
@R.ADJ.n@%.adj%<dim%>3:@R.ADJ.n@%>ӄин%{Æ%}ӄ%{Æ%}й # ;
@R.ADJ.n@%.adj%<aug%>3sg:@R.ADJ.n@%>ӄэначгын # ;
@R.ADJ.n@%.adj%<aug%>3sg:@R.ADJ.n@%>ӄэнайӈын # ;
@R.ADJ.n@%.adj%<aug%>3pl:@R.ADJ.n@%>ӄэначгыт # ;
@R.ADJ.n@%.adj%<aug%>%<3pl%>:@R.ADJ.n@%>ӄэнайӈыт # ;
@R.ADJ.n@%.adj[%+ints%]:@R.ADJ.n@%> PERS-NUM-CLITICS ;
@R.ADJ.n@%.adj[%+ints2%]:@R.ADJ.n@%> PERS-NUM-CLITICS ;
@R.ADJ.n@%.adj[%+approx%]:@R.ADJ.n@%> PERS-NUM-CLITICS ;
@R.ADJ.ynan@%.adj%:@R.ADJ.ynan@ PERS-NUM-CLITICS ;
@R.ADJ.ynan@%.adj%-AD:@R.ADJ.ynan@ӈ%{⁺ⱽᴴ%} PERS-NUM-CLITICS ;

! Crosspos
!! Adverbs
@R.ADJ.n@%.adj%-adv:@R.ADJ.n@%>%{ʔ%}%{Æ%}ʼв # ;
@R.ADJ.n@%.adj%-adv:@R.ADJ.n@%>%{ы%}ӈ # ;
@D.ADJ@%.adj%-vb:@D.ADJ@%>%{ы%}гты # ;
@R.ADJ.n@%.adj%<ints%-adv[%+ints2%]:@R.ADJ.n@%>%{ʔ%}%{Æ%}ʼв # ;
@D.ADJ@%.adj%<ints%-adv[%+ints3%]:@D.ADJ@%>%{ы%}ӈ # ;
@R.ADJ.e@%.adj%<vb%-neg:@R.ADJ.e@%>%{ы%}к%{Æ%} # ;
!! Nouns
@D.ADJ@%.adj%<rel_n:@D.ADJ@%>%{ы%}ԓь N-III-AVYNRAL ; ! INTO-N-III ;
@D.ADJ@%.adj%<rel_n:@D.ADJ@%>%{ы%}чь N-III-AVYNRAL ; ! INTO-N-III ;
@D.ADJ@%.adj%-NMLZ:@D.ADJ@%>%{ы%}гырг%{⁺ⱽᴴ%} N-III-AVYNRAL ; ! INTO-N-III ;
@D.ADJ@%.adj%<ger:@D.ADJ@%>я N-III-AVYNRAL ; ! INTO-N-III ;       ! 'age' nominalisation

@D.ADJ@@U.itsa.verb@%-VB:@D.ADJ@@U.itsa.verb@%>%{Æ%}т V ;
@D.ADJ@@U.itsa.verb@%-CS:@D.ADJ@@U.itsa.verb@%>%{Æ%}в V ;



LEXICON Adj-prefixes
@P.ADJ.n@ST%-:@P.ADJ.n@н%{ы%}%> Adjectives ;
@P.ADJ.e@:@P.ADJ.e@%{Æ%}%> Adjectives ;   !!! FIND ME
@P.ADJ.n@@U.itsa.adj@ST%-:@P.ADJ.n@@U.itsa.adj@н%{ы%}%> NOMINALS ;
@P.ADJ.e@@U.itsa.adj@:@P.ADJ.e@@U.itsa.adj@%{Æ%}%> NOMINALS ;
@P.ADJ.ynan@SUPER%-:@P.ADJ.ynan@ынан%{ы%}%> Adjectives ;

LEXICON Intensifiers
[%+ints%]GOOD%-:т%{Æ%}%{N%}%{ы%}%> Adj-prefixes ;
[%+ints%]GOOD%-:т%{Æ%}%{N%}%{ы%}%> NOMINALS ;
NEG%-:т%{Æ%}%{N%}%{ы%}%> NEG ;
[%+ints2%]INTS%-:ԓ%{ы%}ги%> Adj-prefixes ;
[%+approx%]SEEM%-:м%{Æ%}ԓ%> Adj-prefixes ;
[%+ints2%]INTS%-:ԓ%{ы%}ги%> NOMINALS ;
[%+approx%]SEEM%-:м%{Æ%}ԓ%> NOMINALS ;
NEG%-:м%{Æ%}ԓ%> NEG ;
[%+ints3%]INTS%-:ныԓги%> Adj-prefixes ;




LEXICON INTJ
%.ij: # ;

LEXICON PTCP
%.ptcp: # ;

LEXICON CONJ          ! ?
%.cnjcoo: # ;

LEXICON CONJ-CA
%.cnjadv: # ;

LEXICON PART
%.part: # ;

LEXICON POST
%.post: # ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Punctuation

%.%.sent:%. # ;
%.%.%.sent:%.%. # ;
%.%.%.%.sent:%.%.%. # ;
…%.sent:… # ;
%;%.sent:%; # ;
%:%.sent:%: # ;
%!%.sent:%! # ;
%-%-%.guio:%-%- # ;
%-%.guio:%- # ;
%−%.guio:%− # ;
%—%.guio:%— # ;
%–%.guio:%– # ;
,%.cm:, # ;
%?%.sent:%? # ;
%'%.apos:%' # ;
%"%.quot:%" # ;
%«%.lquot:%« # ;
%»%.rquot:%» # ;
%”%.rquot:%” # ;
%“%.lquot:%“ # ;
%(%.lpar:%( # ;
%]%.rpar:%] # ;
%[%.lpar:%[ # ;
%)%.rpar:%) # ;
%\%.sent:%\ # ;
%/%.sent:%/ # ;
¶%.par:¶ # ;
